Missouri, session 2026, SB959.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 37, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
three new sections, to be known as sections 37.1300, 37.1310,
and 37.1320, to read as follows:
37.1300. For the purposes of sections 37.1300 to
37.1330, the following terms mean:
(1) "Council", the Missouri GIS advisory council
established in section 37.1310;
(2) "Geographic information system (GIS)", a computer
system for capturing, storing, checking, and displaying data
related to positions on the Earth's surface that enables
easily seeing, analyzing, and understanding patterns and
relationships;
(3) "Geospatial", relating to or denoting data that is
associated with a particular location;
(4) "Missouri Spatial Data Information Service" or
"MSDIS", Missouri's primary spatial data clearinghouse
responsible for collecting and distributing vector data,
aerial photography, and light detection and ranging

SCS SB 959 2
elevation data that are generated, updated, and funded by
state, local, and regional agencies and governments.
37.1310. There is hereby established within the office
of administration the "Missouri GIS Advisory Council", which
is charged with assisting and advising the state in ensuring
the availability, implementation, and enhancement of a
statewide geospatial data infrastructure common to all
jurisdictions. The council shall be established within the
information technology services division of the office of
administration. The council shall serve to support the
existing geospatial infrastructure within the state of
Missouri and strive toward immediate access to statewide
geospatial data for all citizens of this state, especially
life-safety entities including NG9-1-1.
37.1320. 1. The council shall consist of members that
represent a cross-section of subject matter experts striking
a geographic balance from all regions across the state.
Representation should at a minimum include:
(1) The commissioner of administration, or the
commissioner's designee;
(2) The director of the department of conservation, or
the director's designee;
(3) The director of the department of economic
development, or the director's designee;
(4) The director of the department of health and
senior services, or the director's designee;
(5) The director of the department of natural
resources, or the director's designee;
(6) The adjutant general of the department of the
national guard, or the adjutant general's designee;
(7) The director of the department of public safety,
or the director's designee;

SCS SB 959 3
(8) The director of the department of transportation,
or the director's designee;
(9) The director of the United States Geological
Survey, or the director's designee;
(10) The chief of the United States Department of
Agriculture – Natural Resource Conservation Service, or the
chief's designee;
(11) The chair of the Missouri 911 service board, or
the chair's designee;
(12) The director of the Missouri Spatial Data
Information Service, or the director's designee;
(13) The director of the state land surveyor program,
or the director's designee;
(14) The director of the National Geospatial Agency
West, or the director's designee;
(15) The secretary of state, or the secretary's
designee; and
(16) No less than fourteen citizens of Missouri,
appointed by the commissioner of administration or the
commissioner's designee. Such individuals shall represent
federal, city, county, and local government; the private
sector; public safety; licensed professional land surveyors;
and academia.
2. By invitation of the council, additional subject
matter experts may participate in activities as noncouncil
members and do not require an appointment by the
commissioner of administration.
3. Appointed members of the council shall serve two-
year terms and shall serve until their successors are
appointed. Vacancies on the council shall be filled in the
same manner as the original appointment and such member
appointed shall serve the remainder of the unexpired term.

SCS SB 959 4
4. The council shall convene, at a minimum, quarterly
and as otherwise required by the commissioner of
administration or the office of geospatial information.
5. The council shall designate from its members a
chair and chair-elect for one-year terms and shall adopt
written guidelines to govern the management of the council.
6. Each appointed member of the council shall serve
without compensation but may be reimbursed for the actual
and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their
duties as members of the council, subject to appropriations
for the council.
7. The council shall designate from its members an
executive secretary for the council, who shall maintain the
records and decisions of the council's activities in
accordance with state statute and shall be responsible for
correspondence between the council and other agencies.
8. The council shall not collect any personally
identifiable information of any individual person. For
purposes of this subsection, the term "personally
identifiable information" means information that can be used
to distinguish or trace an individual's identity, such as
name, social security number, or biometric data records,
either alone or when combined with other personal or
identifying information that is linked or linkable to a
specific individual.
✓